Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,147
Insolvency; replacement coverage; duty to provide; director; duties.

(1) If a health maintenance organization is determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, upon such order, all other carriers which participated in the enrollment process with the insolvent health maintenance organization at a group's last regular enrollment period and which are providing coverage for enrollees on the date of the court order shall offer such group's subscribers of the insolvent health maintenance organization a thirty-day enrollment period commencing on the date of the court order. The subscribers transferring from the insolvent health maintenance organization shall be entitled to coverage on the same terms and at the same rates as they would have obtained had they elected the other carrier at the last regular enrollment period.

(2) If no other carrier had been offered to some groups enrolled in the insolvent health maintenance organization or if the director determines that the other health benefit plans lack sufficient health care delivery resources to assure that health care services will be available and accessible to all of the group enrollees of the insolvent health maintenance organization, the director shall allocate equitably the insolvent health maintenance organization's group contracts for such groups among all health maintenance organizations which operate within any portion of the insolvent health maintenance organization's service area, taking into consideration the health care delivery resources of each health maintenance organization. Each health maintenance organization to which a group is allocated shall offer such group the health maintenance organization's existing coverage which is most similar to each group's coverage with the insolvent health maintenance organization at rates determined in accordance with the successor health maintenance organization's existing rating methodology.

(3) The director shall also allocate equitably the insolvent health maintenance organization's individual enrollees who are unable to obtain other coverage among all health maintenance organizations which operate within any portion of the insolvent health maintenance organization's service area, taking into consideration the health care delivery resources of each such health maintenance organization. Each health maintenance organization to which individual enrollees are allocated shall offer such individual enrollees the health maintenance organization's existing coverage for individual or conversion coverage as determined by his or her type of coverage in the insolvent health maintenance organization at rates determined in accordance with the successor health maintenance organization's existing rating methodology. Successor health maintenance organizations which do not offer direct individual enrollment may aggregate all of the allocated individual enrollees into one group for rating and coverage purposes.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 56.